Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.100

Historic archaeological resources on state-owned aquatic lands—Discovery and report—Right of first refusal.

Persons, firms, corporations, institutions, or agencies which discover a previously unreported historic archaeological resource on state-owned aquatic lands and report the site or location of such resource to the department shall have a right of first refusal to future salvage permits granted for the recovery of that resource, subject to the provisions of RCW 27.53.110. Such right of first refusal shall exist for five years from the date of the report. Should another person, firm, corporation, institution, or agency apply for a permit to salvage that resource, the reporting entity shall have sixty days to submit its own permit application and exercise its first refusal right, or the right shall be extinguished.

[ 1988 c 124 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Application—1988 c 124: See notes following RCW 27.53.030.